external/rhvoice/src/scripts/Spanish/include/feats/date.foma
# Copyright (C) 2024-2025  Mateo Cedillo <angelitomateocedillo@gmail.com>

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU Lesser General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <https://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

# Date support for Spanish with documentation
# Writen by Matthew C.
# The format is: DD/MM/YYYY (or DD/MM/AAAA in Spanish)
# Note: date fsts or fomas can be adapted to your preferred date format for another language, but here we 
# are demonstrating how to do in Spanish. Also, please note that you will need to specify your date format 
# in the tokenizer, placing it in the future tokenization type called date, so the date FST can run in 
# these cases when a date is found according to your language.

# Advice: Please do not implement date support in Numbers.foma. Although we did previously and we got 
# very good results, some users may not preffer date support. Let numbers.foma for number processing only. 
# Wait until this date token type to be added and configureable through the core. This way, users can 
# enable or disable date support. However, This  feature needs a conditional tokenizer.

# In this case, the separator is / (slash) that helps to identify and translate a date.
define NZDig 1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9 ; 
define Dig %0|NZDig ; 
define Year Dig^4 ; 
# The following conditions is for a new tokenization type, date:
#define Month [Dig^<2] ; 
#define Day [Dig^<2] ; 
# Here, we will indicate translations for each month.
define months29 {02}:febrero ; 
define months30 
{04}:abril | 
{06}:junio | 
{09}:septiembre | 
{11}:noviembre ; 
define months31 
{01}:enero | 
{03}:marzo | 
{05}:mayo | 
{07}:julio | 
{08}:agosto | 
{10}:octubre | 
{12}:diciembre ; 
define separator %/ ; 
# 12 months:
define months {01}|{02}|{03}|{04}|{05}|{06}|{07}|{08}|{09}|{10}|{11}|{12} ; 
# Let's make conditional stuff:
# The base days is up to 29, useful for february.
define daysBase months|{13}|{14}|{15}|{16}|{17}|{18}|{19}|{20}|{21}|{22}|{23}|{24}|{25}|{26}|{27}|{28}|{29} ; 
# For months with 30 days.
define days30 daysBase | {30} ; 
# For months with 31 days.
define days31 days30 | {31} ; 

define DateRule 
# Convert months to words.
months29 -> || .#. daysBase separator _ separator Year .#. ,, 
months30 -> || .#. days30 separator _ separator Year .#. ,, 
months31 -> || .#. days31 separator _ separator Year .#. ,, 
# In Spanish, convert the last slash (separator) to del. Del 2024.
separator -> del || 
.#. daysBase separator months29 .u _ Year .#. , 
.#. days30 separator months30.u _ Year .#. , 
.#. days31 separator months31.u _ Year .#. ,, 
# And convert the first separator to de. 2 de febrero.
separator -> de || 
.#. daysBase _ months29.u separator Year .#. , 
.#. days30 _ months30.u separator Year .#. , 
.#. days31 _ months31.u separator Year .#. ,, 
# And when a day starts with 01, convert it to primero.
{01} -> primero || .#. _ separator months separator Year .#. ; 

# Finally, we have a date support.
regex DateRule ; 
